Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201814-103
City council; powers; health regulation; jurisdiction.

The council shall have power to define, regulate, suppress and prevent nuisances. The council may create a board of health in cases of a general epidemic or may cooperate with the boards of health provided by the laws of this state. The council may provide rules and regulations for the care, treatment, regulation, and prevention of all contagious and infectious diseases, for the regulation of all hospitals, dispensaries, and places for the treatment of the sick, for the sale of dangerous drugs, for the regulation of cemeteries, and the burial of the dead. The jurisdiction of the council in enforcing the foregoing regulations shall extend over such city and within its three-mile zoning jurisdiction.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 3, p. 406;

C.S.1922, § 3490;

C.S.1929, § 14-103;

R.S.1943, § 14-103;

Laws 2015, LB266, § 2.

The Legislature has impliedly empowered the city of Omaha to obtain a decree in equity abating a public nuisance without proving special damage to city. City of Omaha v. Danner, 186 Neb. 701, 185 N.W.2d 869 (1971).